Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,240
Claim or action for money damages; limitation.

No claim or action seeking to recover money damages shall be brought by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Resolution Trust Corporation, or any other federal banking regulatory agency against any director or officer, including any former director or officer, of any insured financial depository institution as defined in the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989 unless such claim or action arises out of the gross negligence or willful or intentional misconduct of such director or officer during his or her term of office with such insured financial depository institution.

Laws 1993, LB 253, § 1.